Utah statutes.
58-60-114.   Confidentiality -- Exemptions.
(1)  A mental health therapist under this chapter may not disclose any
confidential communication with a client or patient without the express
consent of:
(a)  the client or patient;
(b)  the parent or legal guardian of a minor client or patient; or
(c)  the authorized agent of a client or patient.
(2)  A mental health therapist under this chapter is not subject to Subsection
(1) if:
(a)  he is permitted or required by state or federal law, rule, regulation, or
order to report or disclose any confidential communication, including:
(i)  reporting under Title 62A, Chapter 3, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, or
Exploitation of Disabled Adult;
(ii)  reporting under Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Part 4, Child Abuse or Neglect
Reporting Requirements;
(iii)  reporting under Title 78B, Chapter 3, Part 5, Limitation of Therapist's
Duty to Warn; or
(iv)  reporting of a communicable disease as required under Section 26-6-6;
(b)  the disclosure is part of an administrative, civil, or criminal
proceeding and is made under an exemption from evidentiary privilege under
Rule 506, Utah Rules of Evidence; or
(c)  the disclosure is made under a generally recognized professional or
ethical standard that authorizes or requires the disclosure.
